new_hnd_mo/without_Z_apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="p/I__v">
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ikara</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ine</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ine</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ine</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ine</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InI</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InI</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InI</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InI</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InIM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InIM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InIM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>InIM</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IwA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IwA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IwA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IwA</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Iwe</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Iwe</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Iwe</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Iwe</l><r>I<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="jI"><i>j</i><par n="p/I__v"/></e>
<e lm="pI"><i>p</i><par n="p/I__v"/></e>
<e lm="sI"><i>s</i><par n="p/I__v"/></e>
